Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201653-177.01
Sale for consumption on premises
near campus of college or university; restrictions; commission; waiver; application;
contents; written approval of governing body of college or university.

(1) No alcoholic
liquor shall be sold for consumption on the premises within three hundred
feet from the campus of any college or university in the state, except that
this section:

(a) Does not
prohibit a nonpublic college or university from contracting with an individual
or corporation holding a license to sell alcoholic liquor at retail for the
purpose of selling alcoholic liquor at retail on the campus of such college
or university at events sanctioned by such college or university but does
prohibit the sale of alcoholic liquor at retail by such licensee on the campus
of such nonpublic college or university at student activities or events; and

(b) Does not
prohibit sales of alcoholic liquor by a community college culinary education
program pursuant to section 53-124.15.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(4) of this section, the commission may waive the three-hundred-foot restriction
in subsection (1) of this section taking into consideration one or more of
the following:

(a) The impact of retail sales of alcoholic liquor for consumption
on the premises on the academic mission of the college or university;

(b) The impact
on students and prospective students if such sales were permitted on or near
campus;

(c) The impact on economic development opportunities located within
or in proximity to the campus; and

(d) The waiver would likely reduce the number
of applications for special designated licenses requested by the college or
university or its designee.

(3) To apply for a waiver under this section,
the applicant shall submit a written application to the commission. The commission
shall notify the governing body of the affected college or university when
the commission receives an application for a waiver. The application shall
include:

(a) The address of the location for which the waiver is requested;

(b) The name
and type of business for which the waiver is requested; and

(c) A description
of the justification for the waiver explaining how the proposed location complies
with the findings prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The commission
shall not waive the three-hundred-foot restriction in subsection (1) of this
section without written approval from the governing body of the college or
university or its designee if the physical location of the property which
is the subject of the requested waiver is (a) surrounded by property owned
by the college or university including any public or private easement, street,
or right-of-way adjacent to the property owned by the college or university
or (b) adjacent to property on two or more sides owned by the college or university
including any public or private easement, street, or right-of-way adjacent
to the property owned by the college or university.

Laws 2011, LB407, § 8.